Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:An inmate may not be housed in a correctional facility that primarily houses persons of a different biological sex than that of the inmate if the inmate has previously been convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 against a victim whose biological sex is the same as those persons who are primarily housed in that correctional facility.--- END ---